Massachusetts, session 194th, S2524.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of said chapter 7C of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting after the word “counties”, in line 124, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, the
following words:- ; provided further, that for the purposes of this chapter “state agency” shall
include the Massachusetts Convention Center Authority established under section 33 of chapter
190 of the acts of 1982.
SECTION 2. Section 46 of said chapter 7C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in line 10, the word “shall” and inserting in place thereof the following word:- may.
SECTION 3. Chapter 195 of the acts of 2014 is hereby amended by inserting after section
3 the following section:-
SECTION 3A. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
Authority shall issue a request for proposals to sell, license, or lease naming or sponsorship
rights, including but not limited to, whole building naming rights for all buildings, facilities,
parking garages, function rooms and public areas or other assets owned by the Authority to
of 2

maximize revenue available for tourism and cultural programming in the commonwealth.
Nothing in this section shall require the Authority to issue a request for proposals for any
buildings, facilities, parking garages, function rooms, public areas, or other assets previously
named or already under a licensing, rental, or sponsorship agreement as of December 31, 2024,
unless said naming or sponsorship opportunity is located within a previously named asset.
(b) The executive director shall direct all revenues generated by the Authority under this
section to be split evenly between the Massachusetts Tourism Trust Fund under section 13T of
chapter 23A and the Massachusetts Cultural Facilities Fund under section 42 of chapter 23G.
(c) All requests for proposals issued pursuant to this section shall be held open for a
minimum of 120 days
SECTION 4. The Massachusetts Convention Center Authority shall issue the request for
proposals pursuant to this act within 180 days following enactment and shall issue subsequent
proposals as it deems necessary to maximize revenue in accordance with section 4.
of 2